Washington statutes.
RCW 23.78.100

Provision for conversion of shares and accounts—Limitations upon merger.

(1) When any employee cooperative revokes its election in accordance with RCW 23.78.030, the articles of amendment shall provide for conversion of membership shares and internal capital accounts or their conversion to securities or other property in a manner consistent with Title 23B RCW.

(2) An employee cooperative that has not revoked its election under this chapter may not merge with another corporation other than an employee cooperative. Two or more employee cooperatives may merge in accordance with RCW 23B.01.200, 23B.07.050, and *chapter 23B.11 RCW.

[ 1991 c 72 s 14; 1987 c 457 s 11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 23B.11 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2024 c 22 s 13. For later enactment, see chapter 23B.11A RCW.